Massachusetts, session 194th, H611.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 54B of chapter 71 of the General Laws, as appearing in the 2022
Official Edition, is hereby amended by striking the third paragraph and inserting in place thereof
the following:—
Notwithstanding any general or special law or regulation to the contrary, each school
shall maintain a stock supply of non-patient specific epinephrine to be administered in the event
of an anaphylactic emergency. The department of public health shall promulgate regulations
requiring school districts to adopt and implement policies pursuant to this section. Such
regulations shall require that stock epinephrine be stored in an easily accessible unlocked
location, the number and type of epinephrine auto-injectors required be based on school
population, that the individuals authorized to administer epinephrine meet certain training
of 2

requirements for such administration, and that the stock inventory be checked at regular intervals
for expiration and replacement. A school nurse or other authorized individual who provides,
administers, or assists in the administration of epinephrine to a student believed in good faith to
be having an anaphylactic reaction shall not be liable for any civil damages for negligence in acts
or omissions resulting from the rendering of such treatment. Whenever any employee of a school
district is covered by the immunity granted herein, the school district employing the individual
shall not be liable for any civil damages for negligence in acts or omissions resulting from the
rendering of such treatment.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, the department
of public health in conjunction with the department of elementary and secondary education shall
make all reasonable efforts to obtain federal funding or reimbursement for the implementation of
this act. The department of public health in conjunction with the department of elementary and
secondary education shall inquire about free epinephrine from pharmaceutical companies.
of 2